05_Project/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V-asseoir
%<c4%>%<inf%>: asse%>oir #;								! infinitive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<part%>: ass%>is #;						! present participle
%<c4%>%<past%>%<part%>: ass%>oyant Adj;					! past participle

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: assoi V-PresIndic-SG-re;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: ass%>ieds #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: ass%>ieds #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: ass%>ied #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: assoy%>ez #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: assoi%>ent #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: assey%>ez #;		! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: assey%>ent #;		! present indicative

%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: assoy V-ImperfIndic-re;		! imperfect indicative
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: assey V-ImperfIndic-re;		! imperfect indicative

%<c4%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: ass%>oir V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple
%<c4%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: ass%>iér V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: ass%>oir V-ImperfIndic-re;		! present conditional
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: ass%>iér V-ImperfIndic-re;		! present conditional

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: ass%>ey V-PresSubj;				! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: assoi%>e #;			! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: assoi%>es #;		! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: assoi%>e #;			! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: assoy%>ez #;		! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: assoy%>ent #;		! present subjunctive

%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: ass%>iss V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: ass%>ît #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c4%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: assois #;					! imperative
%<c4%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: assieds #;					! imperative
%<c4%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: assoy%>ez #;				! imperative
%<c4%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: assey%>ez #;				! imperative

LEXICON V-avoir
%<c4%>%<inf%>: avoir #;								! infinitive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<part%>: ay%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c4%>%<past%>%<part%>: eu Adj;						! past participle
%<c4%>%<past%>%<part%>: av%>é Adj;					! past participle

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: ai #;			! present indicative
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: as #;
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: a #;
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: avez #;
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: ont #;

%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: av%>ais #;	! imperfect indicative
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: av%>ais #;
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: av%>ait #;
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: ava%>iez #;
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: ava%>ient #;
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: av%>iont #;

%<c4%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: aur V-FutIndic;				! future indicative simple

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: aur V-ImperfIndic-re;			! present conditional

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: aies #;			! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: ait #;
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: aient #;

%<c4%>%<imper%>: ay V-Imperative-re;				! imperative fix this

LEXICON V-boire
%<c3%>%<inf%>: boi%>re #;							! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: buv%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: bu Adj;						! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: boi%> V-PresIndic-SG-re;	! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: buv%>ez #;		! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: boi%>vent #;	! present indicative

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: buv%> V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative

%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: boi%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: boi%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;	! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: boiv%>e #;		! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: boiv%>es #;
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: boiv%>e #;
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: buv%>iez #;
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: boiv%>ent #;
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: buss%> V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: bût #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: boi%>s #;				! imperative
%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: buv%>ez #;

LEXICON V-connaître
%<c3%>%<inf%>: connaît%>re #;							! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: connaiss%>ant #;				! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: conn%>u Adj;					! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: connai%> V-PresIndic-SG-re;	! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: connaiss%> V-PresIndic-PL;		! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: connaît #;

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: connaiss%> V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: connaît%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: connaît%>r V-ImperfIndic;		! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: connaiss V-PresSubj;			! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: connusse V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: connût #;			! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: connais #;					! imperative
%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: connaiss%>ez #;

LEXICON V-coudre
%<c3%>%<inf%>: coud%>re #;							! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: cous%>ant #;				! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: cous%>u Adj;				! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: coud%>s #;		! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: coud%>s #;
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: coud #;
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: cous%>ez #;
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: cous%>ent #;

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: cous V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: coud%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: coud%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;	! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: cous V-PresSubj;			! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: cous%>iss V-ImperfSubj;	! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: cous%>ît #;	! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: coud%>s #;				! imperative
%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: cous%>ez #;

LEXICON V-croire
%<c3%>%<inf%>: croi%>re #;							! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: croy%>ant #;				! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: cru Adj;					! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: croi%> V-PresIndic-SG-re;	! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: croy%>ez #;	! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: croi%>ent #;	! present indicative

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: croy%> V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative

%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: croi%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: croi%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;	! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: croi%>e #;		! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: croi%>es #;
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: croi%>e #;
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: croy%>iez #;
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: croi%>ent #;
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: cruss%> V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: crût #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: croi%>s #;				! imperative
%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: croy%>ez #;

LEXICON Verbs
asseoir%<verb%>: V-asseoir;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to seat; to sit"
avoir%<verb%>: V-avoir;				! VERB TRANSITIVE/AUX "to have, be" SUPER IRREGULAR
boire%<verb%>: V-boire;				! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE trans = "to drink"; intrans = "to drink alcohol" IRREGULAR
connaître%<verb%>: V-connaître;		! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to know"
coudre%<verb%>: V-coudre;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE "to sew" IRREGULAR
croire%<verb%>: V-croire;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to believe" vowel weirdness
